Washington statutes.
RCW 19.30.160

Civil penalty—Hearing—Court action.

(1) In addition to any criminal penalty imposed under RCW 19.30.150, the director may assess against any person who violates this chapter, or any rule adopted under this chapter, a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars for each violation.

(2) The person shall be afforded the opportunity for a hearing, upon request to the director made within thirty days after the date of issuance of the notice of assessment. The hearing shall be conducted in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW.

(3) If any person fails to pay an assessment after it has become a final and unappealable order, or after the court has entered final judgment in favor of the agency, the director shall refer the matter to the state attorney general, who shall recover the amount assessed by action in the appropriate superior court. In such action, the validity and appropriateness of the final order imposing the penalty shall not be subject to review.

(4) Without regard to other remedies provided in this chapter, the department may bring suit upon the surety bond filed by the farm labor contractor on behalf of a worker whose rights under this chapter have been violated by the contractor. The action may be commenced in any court of competent jurisdiction. In any such action, there shall be compliance with the notice and service requirements set forth in RCW 19.30.170.

[ 1987 c 216 s 4; 1986 c 197 s 17; 1985 c 280 s 15.]